Utah statutes.
76-3-402.   Conviction of lower degree of offense -- Procedure and
limitations.
(1)  If at the time of sentencing the court, having regard to the nature and
circumstances of the offense of which the defendant was found guilty and to
the history and character of the defendant, and after having given any victims
present at the sentencing and the prosecuting attorney an opportunity to be
heard, concludes it would be unduly harsh to record the conviction as being
for that degree of offense established by statute, the court may enter a
judgment of conviction for the next lower degree of offense and impose
sentence accordingly.
(2)  If the court suspends the execution of the sentence and places the
defendant on probation, whether or not the defendant is committed to jail as a
condition of probation, the court may enter a judgment of conviction for the
next lower degree of offense:
(a)  after the defendant has been successfully discharged from probation;
(b)  upon motion and notice to the prosecuting attorney;
(c)  after reasonable effort has been made by the prosecuting attorney to
provide notice to any victims;
(d)  after a hearing if requested by either party under Subsection (2)(c); and
(e)  if the court finds entering a judgment of conviction for the next lower
degree of offense is in the interest of justice.
(3) (a)  An offense may be reduced only one degree under this section, whether
the reduction is entered under Subsection (1) or (2), unless the prosecutor
specifically agrees in writing or on the court record that the offense may be
reduced two degrees.
(b)  In no case may an offense be reduced under this section by more than two
degrees.
(4)  This section does not preclude any person from obtaining or being granted
an expungement of his record as provided by law.
(5)  The court may not enter judgment for a conviction for a lower degree of
offense if:
(a)  the reduction is specifically precluded by law; or
(b)  if any unpaid balance remains on court ordered restitution for the
offense for which the reduction is sought.
(6)  When the court enters judgment for a lower degree of offense under this
section, the actual title of the offense for which the reduction is made may
not be altered.
(7) (a)  A person may not obtain a reduction under this section of a
conviction that requires the person to register as a sex offender until the
registration requirements under Section 77-27-21.5 have expired.
(b)  A person required to register as a sex offender for the person's lifetime
under Subsection 77-27-21.5(12)(c) may not be granted a reduction of the
conviction for the offense or offenses that require the person to register as
a sex offender.
(8)  As used in this section, "next lower degree of offense" includes an
offense regarding which:
(a)  a statutory enhancement is charged in the information or indictment that
would increase either the maximum or the minimum sentence; and
(b)  the court removes the statutory enhancement pursuant to this section.
